Ohio, session 136, SB408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.64 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.64. The twentieth day of August is designated as "Benjamin Harrison Day" in recognition of President Benjamin Harrison, who was born on that day in North Bend, Ohio, in 1833.